Washington statutes.
RCW 10.01.050

Convictions—Necessary before punishment.

No person charged with any offense against the law shall be punished for such offense, unless he or she shall have been duly and legally convicted thereof in a court having competent jurisdiction of the case and of the person.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1001; Code 1881 s 770; 1854 p 76 s 6; RRS s 2118.]